Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB219.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 286.9-100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any fee charged by a licensee for cashing a check or entering into a deferred deposit transaction shall
be disclosed in writing to the bearer of the check prior to cashing the check or entering into a deferred
deposit transaction, and the fee shall be deemed a service fee and not interest.
(b) A licensee shall not charge a service fee in excess of fifteen dollars ($15) per one hundred dollars
($100) on the face amount of a deferred deposit check. A licensee shall prorate any fee, based upon the
maximum fee of fifteen dollars ($15) per one hundred dollars ($100). This service fee shall be for a
period of at least fourteen (14) days.
(2) Before a licensee shall deposit with any bank or other depository institution a check cashed by the licensee, the
check shall be endorsed with the actual name under which the licensee is doing business.
(3) A licensee shall not cash a check payable to a payee other than a natural person unless the licensee has
previously obtained appropriate documentation from the board of directors or similar governing body of the
payee clearly indicating the authority of the natural person or persons cashing the check, draft, or money order
on behalf of the payee.
(4) (a) A licensee shall:
1. Not indicate through advertising, signs, billhead, or otherwise that checks may be cashed without
identification of the bearer of the check; and
2. Require any person seeking to cash a check to submit reasonable identification as prescribed by
the commissioner.
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not prohibit a licensee from cashing a check simultaneously with
the verification and establishment of the identity of the presenter by means other than the presentation
of identification.
(5) (a) Within two (2) business days after being advised by a financial institution that a payment instrument
has been altered, forged, stolen, obtained through fraudulent or illegal means, negotiated without proper
legal authority, or otherwise represents the proceeds of illegal activity, the licensee shall notify the
commissioner and the prosecutor or law enforcement authority in the county in which the check was
received.
(b) If a payment instrument is returned to the licensee by a financial institution for any of the reasons stated
in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the licensee shall not release the payment instrument without the
written consent of the prosecutor or law enforcement authority or a court order.
(6) A licensee shall not alter or delete the date on any payment instrument accepted by the licensee.
(7) A licensee shall not engage in unfair or deceptive acts, practices, or advertising in the conduct of the licensed
business.
(8) A licensee shall not require a customer to provide security for a deferred deposit transaction or require the
customer to provide a guaranty from another person.
(9) (a) A licensee shall not have more than two (2) deferred deposit transactions from any one (1) customer at
any one time.
(b) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the total proceeds received by a[the]
customer from all open[of the] deferred deposit transactions shall not exceed six[five] hundred
dollars ($600)[($500)].
2. a. Subject to subdivision b. of this subparagraph, the commissioner shall, on or before
July 1 of each year, issue an order increasing, or decreasing if the percent change is
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
negative, the maximum amount of total proceeds permitted under subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph by the percent change in the nonseasonally adjusted annual average
Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items,
for the previous calendar year as published by the United States Bureau of Labor
Statistics, except the amount shall be rounded up to the nearest ten dollar ($10)
increment.
b. The commissioner shall not issue an order under subdivision a. of this subparagraph
that results in the amount of total proceeds permitted under subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph exceeding eight hundred fifty dollars ($850).
(10) (a) If the database described in KRS 286.9-140 is unavailable due to technical difficulties with the
database, as determined by the commissioner, a licensee shall utilize the process established in this
subsection to verify deferred deposit transactions.
(b) A licensee shall inquire of any customer seeking to enter into a deferred deposit transaction, whether the
customer has any outstanding deferred deposit transactions from any licensee.
(c) If the customer represents in writing that the customer has no more than one (1) deferred deposit
transaction outstanding to any licensee and that the total proceeds received by the customer from the
outstanding deferred deposit transaction does not equal or exceed the amount permitted under
subsection (9)(b) of this section[five hundred dollars ($500)], a licensee may accept a deferred deposit
transaction in an amount that, when combined with the customer's other outstanding deferred deposit
transaction, does not exceed the amount permitted under subsection (9)(b) of this section[five hundred
dollars ($500) of total proceeds received by the customer].
(d) If the customer represents in writing that the customer has more than one (1) deferred deposit
transaction outstanding to licensees or if the total proceeds received by the customer from the deferred
deposit transactions equal or exceed the amount permitted under subsection (9)(b) of this section[five
hundred dollars ($500)], a licensee shall not enter into another deferred deposit transaction with that
customer until the customer represents to the licensee in writing that the customer qualifies to enter into
a new deferred deposit transaction under the requirements set forth in this subtitle.
(11) A licensee shall not use any device or agreement, including agreements with an affiliate of a licensee, with the
intent to obtain greater charges than are authorized in this subtitle.
(12) A licensee shall not agree to hold a deferred deposit transaction for more than sixty (60) days.
(13) (a) Each deferred deposit transaction shall be made according to a written or electronic agreement that is:
1. Dated and signed by the customer and the licensee or an authorized agent of the licensee; and
2. Made available to the commissioner upon request.
(b) The customer shall receive a copy of the agreement referenced in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) A customer may enter into an agreement referenced in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
1. In person at the licensed location; or
2. If the customer is a citizen of this state, by telephone or other electronic means.
(14) A licensee or its affiliate shall not for a fee renew, roll over, or otherwise consolidate a deferred deposit
transaction for a customer.
(15) An individual who enters into a deferred deposit transaction with a licensee shall not be convicted under the
provisions of KRS 514.040.
(16) A licensee who enters into a deferred deposit transaction with an individual shall not prosecute or threaten to
prosecute the individual under the provisions of KRS 514.040.
(17) Each licensee shall conspicuously display in each of its deferred deposit business locations a sign supplied by
the commissioner that gives the following notice: "No person who enters into a post-dated or deferred deposit
transaction with this business establishment will be prosecuted for or convicted of writing cold checks or of
theft by deception under the provisions of KRS 514.040."
(18) A licensee shall not enter into a deferred deposit transaction with a customer who has two (2) open deferred
deposit transactions.

CHAPTER 98 3
(19) A licensee shall verify a customer's eligibility to enter into a deferred deposit transaction by doing one (1) of
the following, as applicable:
(a) If the database is not fully operational, as determined by the commissioner, the licensee shall verify that
the customer meets the eligibility requirements for a deferred deposit transaction under this subtitle. The
licensee shall maintain a database of all of the licensee's transactions at all of its locations and search
that database to meet its obligation under this subtitle; or
(b) If the database is fully operational, as determined by the commissioner, the licensee shall promptly and
accurately access the database through an internet real-time connection, and verify that the customer
meets the eligibility requirements for a deferred deposit transaction under this subtitle.
Section 2. KRS 286.9-140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A common database with real-time access through an internet connection for deferred deposit service
business licensees implemented in accordance with this subtitle shall be accessible to the department
and a deferred deposit service business licensee to verify whether any deferred deposit transactions are
outstanding for a particular person.
(b) A deferred deposit service business licensee shall accurately and promptly submit such data into the
database as may be required by the commissioner before entering into each deferred deposit transaction
in such format as the commissioner may require by administrative regulation or order, including the
customer's name, Social Security number or employment authorization alien number, address, driver's
license number, amount of the transaction, date of transaction, date that the completed transaction is
closed, and any additional information required by the commissioner.
(c) The commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
administer and enforce the provisions of this subtitle and to assure that the database is used by deferred
deposit service business licensees in accordance with this subtitle.
(2) The commissioner shall impose a fee of[not to exceed] three dollars ($3) per transaction for data required to be
submitted by a deferred deposit service business licensee, which fee may be charged to the customer.
(3) (a) The commissioner may operate the database or may select and contract with a third-party provider to
operate the database.
(b) If the commissioner contracts with a third-party provider for the operation of the database, all of the
following apply:
1. The commissioner shall ensure that the third-party provider selected as the database provider
operates the database pursuant to the provisions of this subtitle;
2. The commissioner shall consider cost of service and ability to meet all the requirements of this
subtitle in selecting a third-party provider as the database provider;
3. In selecting a third-party provider to act as the database provider, the commissioner shall give
strong consideration to the third-party provider's ability to prevent fraud, abuse, and other
unlawful activities associated with deferred deposit transactions and provide additional tools for
the administration and enforcement of this subtitle;
4. The third-party provider shall use the data collected under this subtitle only as prescribed in this
subtitle and the contract with the department and for no other purpose;
5. If the third-party provider violates this subtitle, the commissioner may terminate the contract and
the third-party provider may be barred from becoming a party to any other state contracts;
6. A person injured by the third-party provider's violation of this subtitle may maintain a civil cause
of action against the third-party provider and may recover actual damages plus reasonable
attorney's fees and court costs; and
7. The commissioner may require that the third-party provider collect the fee assessed in subsection
(2) of this section from the licensee. The third-party provider shall remit the fee collected from
the licensee to the commissioner no later than the first day of each month. The third-party
provider shall deposit any fee collected in a separate escrow account in a federally insured
financial institution and shall hold the fee deposited in trust for the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) The database shall allow a deferred deposit service business licensee accessing the database to do all of the
following:
(a) Verify whether a customer has any open deferred deposit transactions with any deferred deposit
business service licensee that have not been closed;
(b) Provide information necessary to ensure deferred deposit service business licensee compliance with any
requirements imposed by the United States Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control and United States
Treasury Office of Financial Crimes Enforcement Network; and
(c) Track and monitor the number of customers who notify a deferred deposit service business licensee of
violations of this subtitle, the number of times a deferred deposit service business licensee agreed that a
violation occurred, the number of times that a deferred deposit service business licensee did not agree
that a violation occurred, the amount of restitution paid, and any other information the commissioner
requires by administrative regulation or order.
(5) While operating the database, the database provider shall do all of the following:
(a) Establish and maintain a process for responding to transaction verification requests due to technical
difficulties occurring with the database that prevent the licensee from accessing the database through
the internet;
(b) Comply with any applicable federal and state provisions to prevent identity theft;
(c) Provide accurate and secure receipt, transmission, and storage of customer data; and
(d) Meet the requirements of this subtitle.
(6) When the database provider receives notification that a deferred deposit transaction has been closed, the
database provider shall designate the transaction as closed in the database immediately, but in no event after
11:59 p.m. on the day the commissioner or database provider receives notification.
(7) (a) The database provider shall automatically designate a deferred deposit transaction as closed in the
database five (5) days after the transaction maturity date unless a deferred deposit service business
licensee reports to the database provider before that time that the transaction remains open because:
1. Of the customer's failure to make payment;
2. The customer's payment instrument or an electronic redeposit is in the process of clearing the
banking system;
3. The customer's payment instrument is being returned to the deferred deposit service business
licensee for insufficient funds, a closed account, or a stop payment order; or
4. Of any other factors determined by the commissioner.
(b) If a deferred deposit service business licensee reports the status of a transaction as open in a timely
manner, the transaction remains an open transaction until it is closed and the database provider is
notified that the transaction is closed.
(c) 1. Notwithstanding any other law, a licensee may accept, collect, or seek payment on a deferred
deposit transaction that is designated as closed in the database if the transaction remains
unpaid due to a returned or dishonored payment instrument.
2. A licensee may exercise all rights and remedies otherwise available under law to enforce
payment of a deferred deposit transaction referenced in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph if
the licensee complies with applicable state and federal collection laws.
3. This paragraph shall apply whether the returned or dishonored payment instrument is within
or after the time periods prescribed under:
a. The Uniform Commercial Code, KRS Chapter 355; or
b. Federal clearinghouse rules.
4. Any collection activity permitted under this paragraph shall not:
a. Constitute a renewal, rollover, or consolidation of a deferred deposit transaction; or
b. Trigger any additional reporting obligations within the database.

CHAPTER 98 5
(8) (a) If a deferred deposit service business licensee stops providing deferred deposit transactions, the
database provider shall designate all open transactions with that licensee as closed in the database sixty
(60) days after the date the deferred deposit service business licensee stops offering deferred deposit
transactions, unless the deferred deposit service business licensee reports to the database provider
before the expiration of the sixty (60) day period which of its transactions remain open and the specific
reason each transaction remains open.
(b) The deferred deposit service business licensee shall also provide to the commissioner a reasonably
acceptable plan that outlines how the deferred deposit service business licensee will continue to update
the database after it stops offering deferred deposit transactions.
(c) The commissioner shall promptly approve or disapprove the plan and immediately notify the deferred
deposit service business licensee of the commissioner's decision.
(d) If the plan is disapproved, the deferred deposit service business licensee may submit a new plan or may
submit a modified plan for the deferred deposit service business licensee to follow.
(e) If at any time the commissioner reasonably determines that a deferred deposit service business licensee
that has stopped offering deferred deposit transactions is not updating the database in accordance with
its approved plan, the commissioner shall immediately close or instruct the database provider to
immediately close all remaining open transactions of that deferred deposit service business licensee.
(9) (a) The response to an inquiry to the database provider by a deferred deposit service business licensee shall
state only that a person is eligible or ineligible for a new deferred deposit transaction and describe the
reason for that determination.
(b) Only the person seeking the transaction may make a direct inquiry to the database provider to request a
more detailed explanation of a particular transaction that was the basis for the ineligibility
determination.
(c) Any information regarding any person's transaction history is confidential; is not subject to public
inspection; is not a public record subject to the disclosure requirements of the Kentucky Open Records
Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884; is not subject to discovery, subpoena, or other compulsory process, except
in an administrative or legal action arising under this subtitle; and shall not be disclosed to any person
other than the commissioner.
(10) The commissioner may access the database only for purposes of an investigation of, examination of, or
enforcement action concerning an individual database provider, licensee, customer, or other person.
(11) (a) The commissioner shall investigate violations of and enforce this subtitle.
(b) The commissioner shall not delegate his or her responsibilities under this subsection to any third-party
provider.
(12) The commissioner may, by administrative regulation or order, do all of the following:
(a) Require that data be retained in the database only as required to ensure deferred deposit service business
licensee compliance with this subtitle;
(b) Require that customer transaction data in the database are archived within three hundred sixty-five
(365) days after the customer transaction is closed unless needed for a pending enforcement or legal
action;
(c) Require that any identifying customer information is deleted from the database when data are archived;
and
(d) Require that data in the database concerning a customer transaction are deleted from the database three
(3) years after the customer transaction is closed or, if any administrative, legal, or law enforcement
action is pending, three (3) years after the administrative, legal, or law enforcement action is completed,
whichever is later.
(13) The commissioner may maintain access to data archived under subsection (12) of this section for examination,
investigation, or legislative or policy review.
(14) A deferred deposit service business licensee may rely on the information contained in the database as accurate
and is not subject to any administrative penalty or civil liability as a result of relying on inaccurate information
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
contained in the database, provided the deferred deposit licensee accurately and promptly submits such data as
required before entering into a deferred deposit transaction with a customer.
(15) The commissioner may use the database to administer and enforce this subtitle.
(16) The commissioner may require a database provider to file a report by March 1 of each year containing the
following information:
(a) The total number and dollar amount of deferred deposit transactions entered into in the calendar year
ending December 31 of the previous year;
(b) The total number and dollar amount of deferred deposit transactions outstanding as of December 31 of
the previous year;
(c) The total dollar amount of fees collected for deferred deposit transactions as of December 31 of the
previous year;
(d) The minimum, maximum, and average dollar amount of deferred deposit transactions entered into, the
total dollar amount of the net charge-offs and write-offs, and the net recoveries of licensees as of
December 31 of the previous year;
(e) The average deferred deposit transaction amount, the average number of transactions, and the average
aggregate deferred deposit transaction amount entered into per customer as of December 31 of the
previous year;
(f) The average number of days a customer was engaged in a deferred deposit transaction for the previous
year; and
(g) An estimate of the average total fees paid per customer for deferred deposit transactions for the
previous year.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 425 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An order of attachment or garnishment of earnings on a judgment-debtor employee provided to a
garnishee-employer shall, at a minimum, contain the following information clearly placed on a single page:
(a) The debtor's name;
(b) One (1) of the following:
1. The debtor's last known physical address; or
2. A statement that the debtor's last known physical address is unknown;
(c) One (1) of the following:
1. The debtor's last known mailing address;
2. A statement that the debtor's last known mailing address is the same as the debtor's last known
physical address; or
3. A statement that the debtor's last known mailing address is unknown;
(d) The amount of the debt that is owed;
(e) Information sufficient to identify the judgment on which the garnishment or attachment is based;
(f) The name and contact information of the creditor's agent;
(g) Where the employer is required to submit remittances; and
(h) Any optional alternative remittance method.
(2) (a) To properly match the judgment-debtor employee, a separate addendum may be used to provide
sensitive identifying information to the garnishee-employer in a manner that protects the employee's
information from public inspection.
(b) A separate addendum used under paragraph (a) of this subsection may include:
1. The debtor's date of birth;
2. One (1) of the following:

CHAPTER 98 7
a. The debtor's Social Security number; or
b. A statement that the debtor's Social Security number is unknown; and
3. If the debtor's full Social Security number is unknown, any additional identifying information.
Section 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act apply to deferred deposit transactions entered on or after the
effective date of this Act.
Section 5. (1) Any provision of an administrative regulation, including 808 KAR 9:010, that conflicts
with Section 1 or 2 of this Act shall be null, void, and unenforceable.
(2) Within 90 days of the effective date of this Act, the Kentucky Department of Financial Institutions and
any other administrative body shall amend, as necessary, any administrative regulations, including 808 KAR 9:010,
that conflict with Section 1 or 2 of this Act to eliminate the conflict.
Became law without Governor's signature April 12, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version